Utah statutes.
58-37c-16.   Civil penalties.
Any person who is a regulated distributor or a regulated purchaser who acts in
violation of the provisions of Section 58-37c-10 in addition to any criminal
penalties, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for
each offense.
